Texas, session 892, HB285.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Except as provided by Section 2 of this Act, for the state fiscal biennium beginning September 1, 2025: (1)  each full-time employee of a state agency, including an institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003, Education Code, is entitled to an increase in the employee's gross annual salary for each state fiscal year of that biennium in an amount equal to $10,000; and (2)  each part-time employee of a state agency, including an institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003, Education Code, is entitled to an increase in the employee's gross annual salary for each state fiscal year of that biennium in an amount that is equal to the product of: (A)  the ratio between the number of hours the employee works and the number of hours required of a full-time employee; and (B)  $10,000. SECTION 2.  Section 1 of this Act does not apply to a member of the legislature or to a member of a board, commission, or other governing body of a state agency, including an institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003, Education Code, who may receive a per diem or expense reimbursement but not a salary for full-time employment. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.